en: Tubas
xx: Tubas
cs: Tuby
da: Tubaer
de: Tubas
es: Tubas
fr: Tubas
it: Tube
ja: チューバ
nl: Tuba's
no: Tubaer
pl: Tuby
pt: Tubas
ru: Тубы
sv: Tubor
tr: Tubalar

en: Electronic Musical Instruments
xx: Electronic Musical Instruments
cs: Elektronické hudební nástroje
da: Elektroniske musikinstrumenter
de: Elektronische Musikinstrumente
es: Instrumentos musicales electrónicos
fr: Instruments de musique électroniques
it: Strumenti musicali elettronici
ja: 電子楽器
nl: Elektronische muziekinstrumenten
no: Elektroniske musikkinstrumenter
pl: Elektroniczne instrumenty muzyczne
pt: Instrumentos musicais eletrônicos
ru: Электронные музыкальные инструменты
sv: Elektriska musikinstrument
tr: Elektronik Müzik Aletleri

en: Audio Samplers
xx: Audio Samplers
cs: Samplery
da: Lydsamplere
de: Audio-Sampler
es: Muestreadores de sonido
fr: Échantillonneurs audio
it: Campionatori di audio
ja: オーディオサンプラー
nl: Audiosamplers
no: Lydsamplere
pl: Samplery audio
pt: Samplers de áudio
ru: Музыкальные сэмплеры
sv: Ljudsamplers
tr: Ses Örnekleyiciler

en: MIDI Controllers
xx: MIDI Controllers
cs: MIDI kontroléry
da: MIDI-controllere
de: MIDI-Controller
es: Controladores MIDI
fr: Contrôleurs MIDI
it: Controller MIDI
ja: MIDIコントローラー
nl: MIDI-controllers
no: MIDI-kontrollere
pl: Kontrolery MIDI
pt: Controladores MIDI
ru: MIDI-контроллеры
sv: MIDI-kontrollenheter
tr: MIDI Kontrolörler

en: Musical Keyboards
xx: Musical Keyboards
cs: Klávesové nástroje
da: Musikkeyboards
de: Musik-Keyboards
es: Teclados musicales
fr: Claviers musicaux
it: Tastiere musicali
ja: 電子キーボード
nl: Muziekkeyboards
no: Klaviaturer
pl: Keyboardy
pt: Teclados musicais
ru: Клавишные инструменты
sv: Keyboards
tr: Müzik Klavyeleri

en: Sound Synthesizers
xx: Sound Synthesizers
cs: Syntetizéry
da: Lydsynthesizere
de: Synthesizer
es: Sintetizadores de sonido
fr: Synthétiseurs, Synthétiseur
it: Sintetizzatori audio
ja: サウンドシンセサイザー
nl: Synthesizers
no: Lydsynthesizere
pl: Syntetyzatory dźwięku
pt: Sintetizadores de som
ru: Синтезаторы звука
sv: Synthar
tr: Ses Sentezleyiciler

en: Percussion
xx: Percussion
cs: Bicí nástroje
da: Perkussion
de: Schlaginstrumente
es: Instrumentos de percusión
fr: Percussions
it: Percussioni
ja: 打楽器・パーカッション
nl: Percussie-instrumenten
no: Slaginstrumenter
pl: Instrumenty perkusyjne
pt: Percussão
ru: Ударные музыкальные инструменты
sv: Slagverk
tr: Perküsyon

en: Bass Drums
xx: Bass Drums
cs: Basové bubny
da: Stortrommer
de: Basstrommeln
es: Bombos
fr: Grosses caisses
it: Grancasse
ja: バスドラム
nl: Bass drums
no: Stortrommer
pl: Bębny basowe
pt: Bumbos
ru: Большие барабаны
sv: Bastrummor
tr: Bas Davullar

en: Cymbals
xx: Cymbals
cs: Činely
da: Bækkener (musik)
de: Becken
es: Platillos
fr: Cymbales
it: Piatti per batteria
ja: シンバル
nl: Bekkens
no: Bekken
pl: Cymbały
pt: Címbalos
ru: Ударные тарелки
sv: Cymbaler
tr: Büyük Ziller

en: Drum Kits
xx: Drum Kits
cs: Bicí soupravy
da: Trommesæt
de: Schlagzeuge
fr: Kits de batterie
it: Batterie
ja: ドラムセット
nl: Drumstellen
no: Trommesett
pl: Zestawy perkusyjne
pt: Conjuntos de bateria
ru: Ударные установки
sv: Trumset
tr: Bateriler

en: Electronic Drums
xx: Electronic Drums
cs: Elektronické bicí
da: Elektroniske trommer
de: Elektronische Schlagzeuge
es: Baterías electrónicas
fr: Batteries électroniques
it: Batterie elettroniche
ja: 電子ドラム
nl: Elektronische drums
no: Elektroniske trommer
pl: Perkusje elektroniczne
pt: Baterias eletrônicas
ru: Электронные ударные установки
sv: Elektriska trummor
tr: Elektronik Davullar

en: Glockenspiels & Xylophones
xx: Glockenspiels & Xylophones
cs: Zvonkohry a xylofony
da: Klokkespil og xylofoner
de: Glockenspiele & Xylophone
es: Glockenspiels y xilófonos
fr: Glockenspiels et xylophones
it: Metallofoni e xilofoni
ja: 鉄琴・木琴
nl: Klokkenspellen en xylofoons
no: Klokkespill og xylofoner
pl: Dzwonki i ksylofony
pt: Glockenspiels e xilofones
ru: Ксилофоны и глокеншпили
sv: Klockspel och xylofoner
tr: Glockenspieller ve Ksilofonlar

en: Gongs
xx: Gongs
cs: Gongy
da: Gongong
de: Gongs
es: Gongs
fr: Gongs
it: Gong
ja: ゴング
nl: Gongs
no: Gongonger
pl: Gongi
pt: Gongos
ru: Гонги
sv: Gonggongar
tr: Gonglar

en: Hand Percussion
xx: Hand Percussion
cs: Ruční perkuse
da: Håndpercussion
de: Handperkussionsinstrumente
es: Percusión de mano
fr: Percussions à main
it: Percussioni a mano
ja: ハンドパーカッション
nl: Handpercussie-instrumenten
no: Håndperkusjon
pl: Ręczne instrumenty perkusyjne
pt: Instrumentos de percussão de mão
ru: Ручная перкуссия
sv: Handhållna slaginstrument
tr: El Perküsyonu

en: Claves & Castanets
xx: Claves & Castanets
cs: Ozvučná dřívka a kastaněty
da: Claves og kastagnetter
de: Kastagnetten
es: Claves y castañuelas
fr: Claves et castagnettes
it: Nacchere e legnetti
ja: クラベス・カスタネット
nl: Claves en castagnetten
no: Rytmepinner og kastanjetter
pl: Klawesy i kastaniety
pt: Claves e castanholas
ru: Клавесы и кастаньеты
sv: Claves och kastanjetter
tr: Klaveler ve Kastanyetler

en: Finger & Hand Cymbals
xx: Finger & Hand Cymbals
cs: Prstové a ruční činely
da: Finger- og håndbækkener
de: Finger- & Handzimbeln
es: Platillos de dedos y manos
fr: Cymbales à doigt et à main
it: Cimbali per dita e mani
ja: フィンガーシンバル・ハンドシンバル
nl: Vinger- en handcimbalen
no: Finger- og håndcymbaler
pl: Saggaty
pt: Címbalo para mãos e dedos
ru: Сагаты и ручные ударные тарелки
sv: Finger- och handcymbaler
tr: Parmak ve El Simballeri

en: Hand Bells & Chimes
xx: Hand Bells & Chimes
cs: Ruční zvonky a chimes
da: Håndholdte klokker og klokkespil
de: Handschellen & -glocken
es: Campanillas y campanas chinas
fr: Clochettes et carillons
it: Campane e campanelli
ja: ハンドベル・ハンドチャイム
nl: Handbellen en klokken
no: Håndklokker og rørklokker
pl: Dzwonki ręczne i dzwony rurowe
pt: Sinos e carrilhões
ru: Ручные колокольчики и колокола
sv: Handklockor och -klockspel
tr: Çıngıraklar ve Çanlar

en: Hand Drums
xx: Hand Drums
cs: Ruční bubínky
da: Håndtrommer
de: Handtrommeln
es: Tambores de mano
fr: Tambours à main
it: Tamburi manuali
ja: ハンドドラム
nl: Handtrommels
no: Håndtrommer
pl: Bębny ręczne
pt: Tambores de mão
ru: Ручные барабаны
sv: Handtrummor
tr: El Davulları

en: Bongos
xx: Bongos
cs: Bonga
da: Bongotrommer
de: Bongos
es: Bongos
fr: Bongos
it: Bonghi
ja: ボンゴ
nl: Bongo's
no: Bongotrommer
pl: Bongosy
pt: Bongôs
ru: Бонго
sv: Bongos
tr: Bongolar

en: Cajons
xx: Cajons
cs: Cajony
da: Cajoner
de: Cajons
es: Cajones
fr: Cajóns
it: Cajón
ja: カホン
nl: Cajóns
no: Cajoner
pl: Kachony
pt: Cajóns
ru: Кахоны
sv: Cajoner
tr: Kajonlar